test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-njuammel_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - njuäʹmmel contract stem jänis: # Noun - full paradigm
     njuäʹmmel+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: njuäʹmmel
     njuäʹmmel+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: njuäʹmmel
     njuäʹmmel+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: njuäʹmmel
     njuäʹmmel+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: njuäʹmmla
     njuäʹmmel+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: njuäʹmmlest
     njuäʹmmel+N+Sg+Com+Indef: njuäʹmmlin
     njuäʹmmel+N+Ess+Indef: njuäʹmmlen
     njuäʹmmel+N+Par+Indef: njuäʹmmled
     njuäʹmmel+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [njuäʹmmeltaa, njuäʹmmeltää]
     njuäʹmmel+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: njuäʹmmel
     njuäʹmmel+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: njuäʹmmli
     njuäʹmmel+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: njuäʹmmlid
     njuäʹmmel+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: njuäʹmmlid
     njuäʹmmel+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: njuäʹmmlin
     njuäʹmmel+N+Pl+Com+Indef: njuäʹmmlivuiʹm
     njuäʹmmel+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [njuäʹmmlitaa, njuäʹmmlitää]
     
